Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 10

Arkansas Milk Stabilization Board

Subchapter 1

— Arkansas Milk Stabilization Board Act

2-10-101. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Milk Stabilization Board Act”.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 754, § 1.

2-10-102. Findings — Purposes.

The General Assembly finds that:

The dairy industry is an essential agricultural activity of the State of Arkansas;

Dairy farms, associated suppliers, marketers, processors, and retailers are an integral component of the state's economy;

The ability of a dairy farm, associated supplier, marketer, processor, and retailer to provide a stable, local supply of pure and wholesome milk is a matter of great importance to the health and welfare of the people of this state;

Dairy farms are an integral part of the state's rural communities;

Dairy farms preserve land for agricultural purposes and provide needed economic stimuli for rural communities;

Assurance of a fair and equitable price for dairy farmers ensures their ability to provide milk to the market and the vitality of the state's dairy industry and all the associated benefits of the industry;

Recent, dramatic price fluctuations, with a pronounced downward trend, threaten the viability and stability of the dairy industry of this state; and

The federal order system, implemented by the Agricultural Marketing Agreement Act of 1937, 7 U.S.C. § 601 et seq., established only minimum prices paid to producers for raw milk, without preempting the power of the state to regulate milk prices above the minimum levels so established.

The purposes of this subchapter are to:

Take all necessary steps to assure the continued viability of dairy farming in the state;

Assure consumers of an adequate, local supply of pure and wholesome milk;

Neither displace the federal order system nor encourage the merging of federal orders; and

Encourage increased production to meet the state's need for quality milk.

One (1) member's term expiring after five (5) years.

Members of the board shall draw lots to determine the length of the initial term.

Not less than thirty (30) calendar days before the expiration of the terms of the members of the board under subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(4) of this section, interested parties shall submit to the Governor the names of nominees for the positions to be filled, and the Governor shall appoint the new members from each list of nominees.

If no lists are submitted, the appointments shall be at the discretion of the Governor.

Each member selected for the board shall serve for a term of five (5) years except as provided in subsection (b) of this section and until his or her successor is selected as provided in this subsection.

A member of the board may be removed by a majority vote of the remaining board members for:

Conviction of a felony;

Failing to attend three (3) consecutive meetings; or

No longer meeting the qualifications for his or her initial appointment.

Upon a vacancy of a member of the board, the Governor shall make a new appointment within thirty (30) days.

Members of the board shall organize immediately after their appointment and shall elect a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary-treasurer from the membership of the board, whose duties shall be those customarily exercised by those officers or specifically designated by the board.

Meetings of the board shall be called by the chair or by four (4) members of the board.

Four (4) members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business of the board.

The members of the board shall receive no salary or other compensation for their services except that they may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq. for attending meetings of the board.

The Secretary of the Department of Agriculture shall assist the board when necessary by providing resources and guidance.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (i), substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Agriculture Department” and deleted “and the Deputy Director of the Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission” preceding “shall assist”.

Administer this subchapter;

Research other states to determine how those states support their dairy farmers;

Investigate methods of milk production, dairy pricing, and support of the dairy industry;

Create a plan to assist Arkansas dairy farmers that would be equitable to all parties in the state dairy industry and withstand legal challenges;

[Repealed.]

Provide a forty-five-day period for public comment on the proposed plan provided in subdivision (a)(5) of this section;

Create the final plan for submission to the Legislative Council following the public comment period; and

Promulgate rules the board considers necessary or desirable to implement the final plan determined in subdivision (a)(7) of this section.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment repealed (a)(5); and substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Agriculture Department” in (c)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 754, § 1.

2-10-103. Arkansas Milk Stabilization Board.

There is created no later than July 1, 2007, the Arkansas Milk Stabilization Board, to be composed of five (5) members appointed by the Governor as follows:

Two (2) members who are actively and principally engaged in dairy farming in this state;

One (1) member who is an Arkansas consumer;

One (1) member who is an Arkansas milk processor; and

One (1) member who is an Arkansas retailer.

Each member appointed to the board shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years except that the initial members of the board shall be appointed for terms that result in:

One (1) member's term expiring after one (1) year;

One (1) member's term expiring after two (2) years;

One (1) member's term expiring after three (3) years;

One (1) member's term expiring after four (4) years; and

History.

Acts 2007, No. 754, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 11.

2-10-104. Powers and duties of the Arkansas Milk Stabilization Board.

The Arkansas Milk Stabilization Board shall:

The board shall submit its final plan as determined under subdivision (a)(7) of this section and rules as determined under subdivision (a)(8) of this section to the Legislative Council for review no later than March 1, 2008.

(1)Once reviewed by the Legislative Council, the Department of Agriculture shall implement the plan.

The board shall monitor progress and success of the plan.

The board shall have jurisdiction over milk and milk products marketed in the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 754, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 12, 13.

Subchapter 2

— Dairy Stabilization Grant Act

2-10-201. Findings — Intent.

The General Assembly finds that:

The State of Arkansas is at risk of losing its dairy industry if immediate legislative action is not taken to reduce the sharp decline in the number of its dairy farms; and

The loss of the dairy industry in Arkansas will result not only in the demise of dairy farming but also in significantly higher milk cost to Arkansas's citizens, including its children, and a loss of jobs in the processing of milk products.

The intent of this subchapter is to:

Prevent harm to Arkansas's consumers and dairy industry;

Establish the Dairy Stabilization Program, which will safeguard the interests of dairy producers in this state;

Ensure that dairy producers receive fair market breakeven prices;

Provide consumers a continuous and affordable supply of Arkansas-produced fluid milk and other dairy products;

Reverse the loss of dairy farms in the state;

Significantly curtail the increase in milk prices to the consumer by helping to ensure in-state production; and

Maintain and potentially increase jobs in the processing of milk products by stabilizing prices to dairy farmers.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 968, § 1.

2-10-202. Definition.

As used in this subchapter, “milk producer” means a person or entity that operates a bovine dairy farm that possesses a valid permit signed by the administrator of the Arkansas Grade “A” Milk Program.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 968, § 1.

2-10-203. Dairy Stabilization Grant.

The Dairy Stabilization Grant is created.

If funds are available, the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture shall calculate monthly the difference between the average monthly blend price of milk received by Arkansas milk producers as estimated by the secretary and seventy percent (70%) of the average monthly cost of producing milk in Missouri and Tennessee as estimated by the United States Department of Agriculture.

If the average monthly blend price of milk received by Arkansas milk producers is lower than seventy percent (70%) of the calculated average cost of producing milk in Missouri and Tennessee, the milk producer is eligible for a monthly Dairy Stabilization Grant in the amount of the difference, which will be paid quarterly. The secretary shall pay the milk producer by the fifteenth day of the month following the end of the quarter.

The secretary shall not pay a milk producer more than five dollars ($5.00) per hundred weight of milk per month under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

Grants received by a milk producer under this section shall not exceed an annual average of two dollars ($2.00) per hundred weight of milk.

Grants authorized by the secretary shall be made to the milk producer from moneys appropriated by the General Assembly for that purpose.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Agriculture Department” in (b)(1)(A).

Fifty cents (50¢) per hundred weight of milk for each hundred weight of milk produced above the milk producer's average annual milk production.

A milk producer's average annual milk production specified under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section shall be calculated over the two (2) years preceding the year of disbursement; and

Fifty cents (50¢) per hundred weight of milk if the milk contains a somatic cell count of less than four hundred thousand (400,000).

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “a somatic cell count of less than four hundred thousand (400,000)” for “less than four-hundred-thousand somatic cell count” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Agriculture Department” in the introductory language of (a).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 968, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 14.

2-10-204. Milk production and quality incentives.

If funds are available, as an incentive to continue milk production and to improve milk quality, the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture may pay a milk producer the following incentive payments:

A milk producer that begins milk production after July 31, 2009, qualifies for payments under subsection (a) of this section after the completion of one (1) continuous year of milk production in Arkansas.

Annual payments to a milk producer under this section shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

If funds are available, the secretary shall pay the annual production and quality incentive payments to the eligible milk producers by January 15 of the following year.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 968, § 1; 2011, No. 776, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 15.

2-10-205. Rules.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration and the Secretary of the Department of Agriculture shall adopt rules to implement this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 968, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 16.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” and “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Agriculture Department”.